Wisconsin, session 2025, SB1061.
do enact as follows:SB1061,11Section 1. 134.44 of the statutes is created to read:SB1061,2,42134.44 Data center moratorium. (1) Definition. In this subsection, 3“data center” means a facility having a primary purpose of storing, managing, and 4processing digital data and that satisfies any of the following:SB1061,2,55(a) Has at least 5,000 servers.SB1061,2,66(b) Occupies at least 10,000 square feet.SB1061,2,77(c) Has an electricity demand of at least 100 megawatts.SB1061,2,108(2) Moratorium. No person may operate a data center in this state unless all 9of the following are provided by law, as determined by the secretary of agriculture, 10trade and consumer protection:SB1061,2,1111(a) The establishment of a statewide data center planning authority.SB1061,2,1312(b) A prohibition on shifting data center energy and water costs to residential 13customers.SB1061,3,21(c) A prohibition on shifting data center energy infrastructure costs to 2residential customers.SB1061,3,33(d) The creation of a land and community recovery funding mechanism.SB1061,3,44(e) The elimination of state and local financial subsidies.SB1061,3,55(f) Mandatory data center public reporting of water and electricity usage.SB1061,3,76(g) The creation of data center specific safeguards concerning air, water, and 7noise pollution to protect the environment and people’s health.SB1061,3,98(h) A requirement that 100 percent of energy derived for data centers must be 9provided for by newly built, directly accessible renewable energy.SB1061,3,1210(i) A requirement that the contractor constructing the newly built, directly 11accessible renewable energy projects required for purposes of par. (h) pay either a 12prevailing wage or collectively bargained wages.SB1061,3,1413(j) A requirement that the contractor constructing any data center pay either 14a prevailing wage or collectively bargained wages.SB1061,3,1615(k) The restoration of the public service commission’s integrated resource 16planning authority.SB1061,3,1817(L) A prohibition on nondisclosure agreements between data centers, data 18center developers, utilities, and local government officials.SB1061,3,2019(m) A requirement that data centers must receive prior approval by 20referendum of the electors of the municipality where the data center is to be located.SB1061,3,2221(n) The creation of an enforcement and penalty structure specific to data 22centers.SB1061,3,2323